N-I-aaapani_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - aaápani - ok : # -m inanimate noun, blood AEW NA1
     aaápani+NI+Sg: aaápani
     aaápani+NI+Pl: aaápanistsi
     aaápani+NI+Non: aaápani

     aaápani+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: nitsáápani
     aaápani+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: nitsáápanistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px1Sg+Non: nitsáápani

     aaápani+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: nitsáápaninnaani
     aaápani+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: nitsáápaninnaanistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px1Pl+Non: nitsáápaninnaani

     aaápani+NI+Px21Sg+Sg: kitsáápaninnooni
     aaápani+NI+Px21Sg+Pl: kitsáápaninnoonistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px21Sg+Non: kitsáápaninnooni

     aaápani+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kitsáápani
     aaápani+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kitsáápanistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kitsáápani

     aaápani+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kitsáápanoaawayi
     aaápani+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kitsáápanoaawaistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kitsáápanoaawai

     aaápani+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: otsáápani
     aaápani+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: otsáápanistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px3Sg+Non: otsáápani

     aaápani+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: otsáápanoaawayi
     aaápani+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: otsáápanoaawaistsi
     aaápani+NI+Px3Sg+Non: otsáápanoaawai
